Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF TEXAS PLAN ONE

CHAPTER 831. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 831.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subtitle:

(1) "Annuity" means an amount of money payable in monthly installments for life or for another period as provided by this subtitle.

(2) "Board of trustees" means the entity given responsibility under Section 835.001 for the administration of the retirement system.

(3) "Judicial officer" means a person who presides over a court or a commission to a court named in Section 832.001 and who has never been a member of the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan Two.

(4) "Retiree" means a person who receives an annuity based on service that was credited to the person.

(5) "Retirement system" means the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan One or, as to periods before September 1, 1985, the Judicial Retirement System of Texas.

(6) "Service credit" means the amount of membership, military, and equivalent membership service ascribed by the retirement system to a person and for which the person has made required contributions.

(6-a) "State salary" does not include the amount of any longevity pay payable under Section 659.0445.

(7) "Supreme court" means the Supreme Court of Texas.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 7, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 41.001 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (S.B. 1519), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 831.002. PURPOSE OF SUBTITLE. The purpose of this subtitle is to establish a program of benefits for members, retirees, and other beneficiaries of the retirement system and to establish rules for the management and operation of the retirement system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 41.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 831.003. RETIREMENT SYSTEM. The retirement system is an entity of the state. The Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan One is the name by which all business of the retirement system shall be transacted and all its property held. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, a reference in law to the Judicial Retirement System of Texas is a reference to the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan One.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 8, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 41.003 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 831.004. EXEMPTION FROM EXECUTION. All annuity and other benefit payments from the retirement system, contribution refunds, and rights accrued or accruing under this subtitle to any person are exempt from garnishment, attachment, state and local taxation, levy, sale, and any other process, and are unassignable.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 41.004 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.